Maryland, session 2026, HB1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1382*

HOUSE BILL 1382
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–212.2.
A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY NOT REQUIRE A BIDDER OR OFFEROR, AS A
CONDITION TO SUBMITTING A BID OR PROPOSAL ON A STATE PROCUREMENT, TO
CERTIFY THAT THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR, EXCEPT AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE OR UNDER FEDERAL LAW:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY; OR
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY FOR
THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
13–230.
A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY NOT INCLUDE IN A STATE PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT, OR RENEWAL OF A CONTRACT, A CLAUSE REQUIRING THE CONTRACTOR
TO CERTIFY THAT THE CONTRACTOR, EXCEPT AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS ARTICLE
OR UNDER FEDERAL LAW:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY; OR
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY FOR
THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June 1, 2027,
each unit of State government shall:
(1) update its procurement policies, guidelines, and procedures to reflect
the repeal of Executive Order No. 01.01.2017.25 by means of this Act; and
(2) review any contracts or solicitations in conflict with this Act and amend
the contract or solicitation.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.